Hawaii statutes.
§206E-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings unless
the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

(1) "Authority" means the Hawaii community
development authority established by section 206E-3.

(2) "County" means any county of the State.

(3) "Local governing body" means the county
council.

(4) "Project" means a specific work or
improvement, including real and personal properties, or any interest therein,
acquired, owned, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated, or improved by the
authority, including a residential project, a redevelopment project, or a
commercial project, all as defined herein, or any combination thereof, which
combination shall hereinafter be called and known as a "multipurpose
project".

(A) "Residential project" means a
project or that portion of a multipurpose project, including residential
dwelling units, designed and intended for the purpose of providing housing and
such facilities as may be incidental or appurtenant thereto;

(B) "Redevelopment project" means
an undertaking for the acquisition, clearance, replanning, reconstruction, and
rehabilitation or a combination of these and other methods, of an area for a
residential project, for an incidental commercial project, and for other
facilities incidental or appurtenant thereto, pursuant to and in accordance
with this chapter. The terms "acquisition, clearance, replanning,
reconstruction, and rehabilitation" shall include renewal, redevelopment,
conservation, restoration, or improvement, or any combination thereof;

(C) "Commercial project" means an
undertaking involving commercial or light industrial development, which
includes a mixed use development where commercial or light industrial facilities
may be built into, adjacent to, under or above residential units.

(5) "Project cost" means the total of all
costs incurred by the authority in carrying out all undertakings which it deems
reasonable and necessary for the development of a project including but not
limited to: studies; surveys; plans; specifications; architectural,
engineering, or any other development related services; acquisition of land and
any improvement thereon; site preparation and development; construction;
reconstruction; rehabilitation; the necessary expenses in administering the
chapter; the cost of financing the project; and relocation costs.

(6) "Public agency" means any office,
department, board, commission, bureau, division, public corporation agency, or
instrumentality of the federal, state, or county government.

(7) "Public facilities" includes streets,
utility and service corridors, and utility lines where applicable, sufficient
to adequately service developable improvements in the district, sites for
schools, parks, parking garage, sidewalks, pedestrian ways, and other community
facilities. "Public facilities" shall also include public highways,
as defined by statute, storm drainage systems, water systems, street lighting
systems, off-street parking facilities, and sanitary sewerage systems.

(8) "Qualified person" includes any
individual, partnership, corporation or any public agency, possessing the
competence, expertise, experience, and resources, including financial,
personnel and tangible resources, required for the purposes of the project and
such other qualifications as may be deemed desirable by the authority in
administering the chapter.

(9) "Real property" means lands,
structures, and interests in land, including lands under water and riparian
rights, space rights, and air rights and any and all other things and rights
usually included within the term. Real property also means any and all
interests in such property less than full title, such as easements, incorporeal
hereditaments and every estate, interest, or right, legal or equitable,
including terms for years and liens thereon by way of judgments, mortgages, or
otherwise. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; am L 1979, c 126, §1; am L 1982, c 228,
§4; am L 1984, c 21, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next